New Jersey, session 221, A2663.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from gross income the amount of charitable contributions of food made to and accepted by an organization in the taxable year equal to the amount which would have been allowed to the taxpayer for the federal taxable year under the provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of section 170 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.170) in effect on December 31, 2013. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following enactment.